Nebraska, session 109, LB978.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB978 LB978
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Child sexual abuse material has the same meaning as in section
28-1802;
(b) Internet utility has the same meaning as in section 87-1002;
(c) Obscene has the same meaning as in section 28-807; and
(d) Prohibited content means any depiction or content that:
(i) Is child sexual abuse material;
(ii) Describes or promotes child sexual abuse material; or
(iii) Is obscene.
(2) A person shall not intentionally:
(a) Allow or facilitate access to prohibited content on a publicly
available Internet website;
(b) Issue, sell, give, provide, deliver, transfer, transmit,
circulate, or disseminate by any means on an Internet website any
prohibited content; or
(c) Create or develop prohibited content that is made available on
an Internet website.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, an
individual depicted in or exposed to prohibited content may bring a civil
action for appropriate relief against any person who violates subsection
(2) of this section with respect to such prohibited content.
(b) This subsection does not authorize a civil action by an adult
whose exposure to child sexual abuse material was caused by such adult's
intentional viewing of such material.
(c) Appropriate relief in an action under this subsection includes:
(i) Such preliminary and other equitable relief as may be
appropriate;
(ii) Actual damages, both economic and noneconomic; and
(iii) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs
reasonably incurred.
(d) In an action under this subsection, the doctrine of contributory
-2-

LB978 LB978
2026 2026
negligence shall not apply, and no plaintiff shall be allocated fault
under Chapter 25. A person who violates subsection (2) of this section
shall be jointly and severally liable for damages caused by such
violation.
(4) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against a person
who violates subsection (2) of this section to restrain or enjoin such
violation and for such other equitable relief as the court deems
appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.
(5) An Internet utility does not violate subsection (2) of this
section solely by providing access or connection to or from a website or
other information or content on the Internet or a facility, system, or
network not under the Internet utility's control, including providing
access or transmitting, downloading, or storing data, to the extent that
such Internet utility is not responsible, in whole or in part, for the
creation or development of prohibited content.
(6) This section is intended to create a new statutory cause of
action that is in addition to any other remedy that may exist under the
law. The duties and liabilities created under this section apply whether
or not the violator would be considered a publisher or distributor of
prohibited content under any other statutory or common law cause of
action.
(7) Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative defense in a
civil action brought pursuant to this section.
(8) Any remedy available under this section may be awarded without
regard to whether the conduct giving rise to the remedy resulted in a
criminal conviction.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section, prohibited content has
the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.
(2) There shall be no civil or criminal liability for the viewing or
possession of prohibited content by:
(a) A judge who does so in good faith and for purposes of a
-3-

LB978 LB978
2026 2026
proceeding before the court;
(b) An attorney who does so in good faith in the course of
representing a client or potential client; or
(c) An agent or employee of a judge or attorney who does so in good
faith and for a legitimate purpose while acting with the scope of such
agency or employment.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Child sexual exploitation device or image means an anatomically
correct mannequin, robot, doll, device, or image that:
(i) Has the features of, or features that resemble those of, a
minor; and
(ii) Is intended for use in sexual acts; and
(b) Minor means an individual under eighteen years of age.
(2) A person shall not:
(a) Knowingly buy, sell, deliver, or distribute any child sexual
exploitation device or image;
(b) Knowingly possess a child sexual exploitation device or image
that has been bought, sold, delivered, or distributed; or
(c) Possess a child sexual exploitation device or image with the
intent to engage in any conduct prohibited by subdivision (2)(a) of this
section.
(3)(a) A minor whose features are represented by, or intended by the
violator to be represented by, a child sexual exploitation device or
image, may bring a civil action for appropriate relief against any person
who violates subsection (2) of this section with respect to such device
or image.
(b) Appropriate relief in an action under this subsection includes:
(i) Such preliminary and other equitable relief as may be
appropriate;
(ii) Actual damages, both economic and noneconomic; and
(iii) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs
-4-

LB978 LB978
2026 2026
reasonably incurred.
(4)(a) A person who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be
subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per
violation. The Attorney General or a county attorney may seek recovery of
such civil penalties in a civil action.
(b) The Attorney General or a county attorney may also bring a civil
action against a person who violates subsection (2) of this section to
restrain or enjoin such violation and for such other equitable relief as
the court deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.
(c) Any civil penalties collected under this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 4. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-5-